Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.350

Mandatory retirement prior to seventy years of age prohibited—Exceptions—Waiver of mandatory retirement.

(1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, no employee of the state of Washington or any of its political subdivisions or any institution supported in total or in part by the state or any of its political subdivisions, other than employees covered by chapters 41.26 and 43.43 RCW, shall be compelled to retire solely on the basis of age prior to attaining seventy years of age.

(2) All compulsory retirement provisions relating to public employees, other than employees covered by chapters 41.26 and 43.43 RCW, may be waived for individuals attaining seventy years of age by the individual's employer.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 159 s 1.]